Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.130

Payment of damages—Effect—Costs—Appellate review.

Upon the entry of judgment upon the verdict of the jury or the decision of the court awarding damages, the state may make payment of the damages and the costs of the proceedings by depositing them with the clerk of the court, to be paid out under the direction of the court or judge thereof; and upon making such payment into court of the damages assessed and allowed for any land, real estate, premises, or other property mentioned in the petition, and of the costs, the state shall be released and discharged from any and all further liability therefor, unless upon appeal the owner or party interested recovers a greater amount of damages; and in that case the state shall be liable only for the amount in excess of the sum paid into court and the costs of appeal.

In the event appellate review is sought by any party to the proceedings, the moneys paid into the superior court by the state pursuant to this section shall remain in the custody of the court until the final determination of the proceedings by the supreme court or the court of appeals.

[ 1988 c 202 s 7; 1971 c 81 s 35; 1951 c 177 s 4; 1925 ex.s. c 98 s 3; 1891 c 74 s 7; RRS s 897.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.